Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.350

Salary reduction plan—Rules.

The authority shall adopt rules necessary to implement RCW 41.05.123, 41.05.300 through 41.05.340, and 41.05.295.

[ 2008 c 229 s 9; 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 229: See note following RCW 41.05.295.

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.